District of Columbia statutes.
5-521.03

Applicability of subchapter to United States Secret Service Uniformed Division and United States Park Police force.

The provisions of this subchapter shall be applicable to the United States Park Police force under regulations promulgated by the Secretary of the Interior.

Oct. 24, 1951, 65 Stat. 607, ch. 544, § 3
Nov. 15, 1977, 91 Stat. 1371, Pub. L. 95-179
Oct. 15, 2010, 124 Stat. 3033, Pub. L. 111-282, § 4(b)(1)(C)
Merit system, application to police officers and firefighters, see § 1-632.03.
This section is referenced in § 1-632.03.
1981 Ed., § 4-404.
1973 Ed., § 4-809.
Pub. L. 111-282 substituted “shall be applicable to the United States Park Police force under regulations promulgated by the Secretary of the Interior” for “shall be applicable to the United States Secret Service Uniformed Division and the United States Park Police force, under regulations promulgated by the Secretary of the Treasury and the Secretary of the Interior, respectively”.